District of Columbia statutes.
1-615.59

Applicability.

This subchapter shall apply to actions taken after July 13, 1998.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1559
as added Oct. 7, 1998, D.C. Law 12-160, § 102(c), 45 DCR 5147
1981 Ed., § 1-616.19.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 1-615.51.